Massachusetts, session 194th, HD5305.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 127 is hereby amended by striking out section 87A and inserting in place thereof
the following section:-
Section 87A. (a) For the purposes of this section, the terms "state correctional facility'',
"state prison'' and "county correctional facility'' shall have the same meanings as those terms are
defined in section 1 of chapter 125.
(b) The department of correction and sheriffs shall provide any person committed to a
state correctional facility, state prison or county correctional facility, including a jail or house of
correction, with voice communication services, including phone calls, free of charge to the
person initiating and the person receiving the communication; provided that the department of
correction and sheriffs shall provide an opportunity for persons in their custody to the extent
possible a minimum of 15 minutes each day but no more than 60 minutes each day as determined
individually in the discretion of the commissioner of the department of correction and the
of 2

sheriffs of each county for their respective facilities; provided further, that the department of
correction and sheriffs shall ensure adequate infrastructure for voice communication services;
and provided further, that nothing in this section shall prohibit in-person contact visits.
(c) The department of correction and sheriffs may supplement voice communication
services with other communication services, including, but not limited to, video and electronic
communication services; provided, however, that other communication services shall not replace
voice communication services; and provided further, that other communication services shall be
provided free of charge to the person initiating and the person receiving the communication.
of 2